Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 4. Child Protection Act
§ 14-3-412.
Commencement of proceedings; contents of petition.

Proceedings in juvenile court are commenced by filing a petition with the clerk of the court. The petition and all subsequent pleadings, motions, orders and decrees shall be entitled “State of Wyoming, In the Interest of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . , minor.” A petition shall be signed by the district attorney on information and belief of the alleged facts. All petitions must be verified.

The petition shall set forth all jurisdictional facts, including but not limited to:

The child’s name, date of birth and address;

The names and addresses of the child’s parents, guardian or custodian and the child’s spouse, if any;

Whether the child is being held in shelter care and if so, the name and address of the facility and the time shelter care commenced;

A statement setting forth with particularity the facts which bring the child within the provisions of this act; and

Whether the child is an Indian child as defined in the federal Indian Child Welfare Act and, if so, a statement setting forth with particularity the notice provided to the appropriate tribal court.

The petition shall state if any of the facts enumerated in subsection (b) of this section are unknown.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; 2005, ch. 230, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (b)(v).

The 2005 amendment,

effective March 10, 2005, made stylistic changes to (b)(iii) and (b)(iv).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 70, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “The provisions of W.S. 14-3-427(e) and (f), 14-3-429(d), 14-6-227(e) and (f) and 14-6-427(e) and (f) as amended by section 1 of this act, shall apply to child protection cases in which a petition was filed under W.S.

14-3-412

,

14-6-212

or

14-6-412

on or after July 1, 2009.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Due process.—

Juvenile court violated a father’s right to due process because it failed to give him reasonable notice and a meaningful opportunity to be heard in the child protection action; many of the requirements of the Child Protection Act were not followed because the father was not informed when the child was taken into protective custody or of the shelter care hearing; the father was materially prejudiced by the due process violations because his lack of involvement colored the juvenile court’s ruling. AA v. State, 2021 WY 18, 479 P.3d 1252,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2021).

Cited

in

K.H. v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs., 2007 WY 196, 173 P.3d 365,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Dec. 12, 2007).

§ 14-3-413.
Order to appear; contents thereof; when child taken into immediate custody; waiver of service.

After a petition is filed, the court shall issue an order to appear. The order shall:

State the name of the court, the title of the proceedings and the time and place for the initial hearing;

Direct the persons named therein to appear personally at the hearing and direct the person having actual physical custody or control of the child to present the child before the court at the hearing;

Be directed to the child’s parents, guardian, custodian and the child’s spouse, if any, and to any other person the court deems necessary; and

Be directed to the child if fourteen (14) years of age or more.

If it appears to the court by affidavit by the district attorney based on actual knowledge or on information and belief that the conduct, condition or surroundings of the child seriously endanger the child’s health or welfare, that the child may be removed from the jurisdiction of the court or that the child will not be brought before the court notwithstanding service of the order, the court may direct in the order to appear that the person serving the order take the child into immediate custody and bring him before the court.

Service of the order may be waived either in writing or by voluntary appearance at the hearing, provided a child may waive service of the order only with the consent of his parents, guardian, custodian, guardian ad litem or counsel.

With respect to a child who is alleged to have been abused or neglected, a noncustodial parent or putative father who has not had parental rights to the child removed by a court, and who is not alleged in the petition to have abused or neglected the child, shall be served with notice of the child protective proceeding pursuant to W.S.

14-3-414

and

14-3-415

. The notice shall inform the noncustodial parent or putative father of the following:

A petition has been filed;

The noncustodial parent or putative father has been named as such in the petition;

A response from the noncustodial parent or putative father is required within sixty (60) days of the date of service; and

Failure to respond to the notice, appear at hearings or participate in the case may result in the termination of his parental rights;

The noncustodial parent or putative father may be considered for possible placement of the child.

A noncustodial parent or putative father served with notice of the child protective proceeding shall:

Respond and appear as required by this section and W.S.

14-3-414

and

14-3-415

;

Admit or deny that he is the noncustodial parent or putative father of the child;

Submit to the jurisdiction of the court;

Provide information and abide by any order as required by the court.

A parent or putative father who is served pursuant to W.S.

14-3-414

and

14-3-415

and fails to respond as required by this section may not thereafter assert parental rights in contravention of any permanency plan for the child required by W.S. 14-3-431(j) and (k) unless good cause can be shown for failure to respond.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2009, ch. 196, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (d) through (f).

Due process.—

Juvenile court violated a father’s right to due process because it failed to give him reasonable notice and a meaningful opportunity to be heard in the child protection action; many of the requirements of the Child Protection Act were not followed because the father was not informed when the child was taken into protective custody or of the shelter care hearing; the father was materially prejudiced by the due process violations because his lack of involvement colored the juvenile court’s ruling. AA v. State, 2021 WY 18, 479 P.3d 1252,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2021).

Cited in

RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014).

§ 14-3-414.
Service of process; order of custody.

In proceedings under this act, service of order to appear or other process within the state shall be made by the sheriff of the county where service is made, by his undersheriff or deputy or by any law enforcement officer or responsible adult not a party to the proceeding and appointed by the clerk.

Within the state, service of order to appear is made by personally delivering a copy of the order together with a copy of the petition to the person ordered to appear, provided that parents of a child may both be served by personally delivering to either parent two (2) copies of the order and petition, one (1) copy for each parent. A child under the age of fourteen (14) years is served by delivering a copy of the order together with a copy of the petition to the child’s parents, guardian, custodian or other adult having the actual physical custody and control of the child or to a guardian ad litem or attorney appointed for the child.

If it appears to the court by affidavit that the parents, guardian or custodian of the child cannot be found within the state, the court may order personal service outside the state or service by certified mail with return receipt requested signed by addressee only. The state agency having custody of the child shall also file an affidavit with the court explaining the efforts made to locate the missing parent when the address of the child’s parents, guardian or custodian is unknown and cannot with reasonable diligence be ascertained, and the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the child and to receive service of process.

Service by certified mail is complete on the date the clerk receives the return receipt signed by addressee. Personal service either within or outside the state is complete on the date when copies of the order to appear and petition are delivered to the person to be served.

When personal service of order to appear is made within the state, service shall be completed not less than two (2) days before the hearing and when made outside the state, service shall be completed not less than five (5) days before the hearing. However, notwithstanding any provision within this act, the court may order that a child be taken into custody as provided in W.S.

14-3-413

or that a child be held in shelter care pending further proceedings as provided in W.S.

14-3-409

, even though service of order to appear on the parents, guardian or custodian of the child is not complete at the time of making the order.

If the person’s residence is unknown, service may be had by constructive service or by publication as provided in the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2001, ch. 61, § 2; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; 2009, ch. 196, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, twice in (e), substituted “shall be completed” for “must be completed.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (f).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

Due process.—

Juvenile court violated a father’s right to due process because it failed to give him reasonable notice and a meaningful opportunity to be heard in the child protection action; subsection (e) did not absolve the State of its obligation to give the father notice of the proceedings or the juvenile court of its obligation to give the father the opportunity to be heard on the child’s shelter care and/or placement. AA v. State, 2021 WY 18, 479 P.3d 1252,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2021).

Cited

in

RH v. State (in the Interest of DRS), 2011 WY 128, 261 P.3d 697,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Sept. 14, 2011); RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014).

§ 14-3-415.
Presence of parent, custodian or guardian at hearing; failure to appear; avoidance of service; issuance of bench warrant.

The court shall insure the presence at any hearing of the parents, guardian or custodian of any child subject to the proceedings under this act.

Any person served with an order to appear as provided in W.S.

14-3-414

and without reasonable cause fails to appear, is liable for contempt of court and the court may issue a bench warrant to cause the person to be brought before the court.

If the child, his parents, guardian or custodian or any other person willfully avoids or refuses service of order to appear, or it appears to the court that service of the order will be ineffectual or that the welfare of the child requires that he be brought immediately into the custody of the court, a bench warrant may be issued by the court for the child or his parents, guardian, custodian or any person having the actual physical custody or control of the child.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

Due process.—

Father’s due process rights were not violated when the juvenile court denied his request for transport from the Wyoming Honor Farm to appear in person at the permanency hearing because he was permitted to appear by telephone while his counsel was present in the courtroom. FH v. State (In the Interest of ECH), 2018 WY 83, 423 P.3d 295,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2018).

§ 14-3-416.
Appointment of guardian ad litem.

The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child who is a party to proceedings under this act if the child has no parent, guardian or custodian appearing in his behalf or if the interests of the parents, guardian or custodian are adverse to the best interest of the child. A party to the proceeding or employee or representative thereof shall not be appointed guardian ad litem for the child.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

Guardian ad litem properly appointed. —

The trial court did not err in appointing an attorney for one or more of the children to act as guardian ad litem for the children; the person appointed to represent the children was specifically referred to as a guardian ad litem, and his participation in the trial was within the boundaries set forth in case law.DH v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re "H" Children), 2003 WY 155, 79 P.3d 997,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. Jan. 13, 2004).

Cited in

RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Attorney for Child Versus Guardian Ad Litem: Wyoming Creates a Hybrid, but is it a Formula for Malpractice?,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 381 (1999).

§ 14-3-417.
Subpoenas for witnesses and evidence.

Upon application of any party to the proceeding, the clerk shall issue and the court on its own motion may issue subpoenas requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of records, documents or other tangible evidence at any hearing.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

§ 14-3-418.
Search warrant; when authorized; affidavit required; contents of affidavit and warrant; service and return.

The court or a commissioner may issue a search warrant within the court’s jurisdiction if it appears by application supported by affidavit of one (1) or more adults that a child is being neglected, unlawfully detained or physically abused and his health or welfare requires that he be taken immediately into custody, or it appears by application supported by affidavit of one (1) or more adults that evidence of child abuse exists.

The affidavit shall be in writing, signed and affirmed by the affiant. The affidavit shall set forth:

The name and age of the child sought, provided that if the name or age of the child is unknown the affidavit shall set forth a description of the child sufficient to identify him with reasonable certainty and a statement that the affiant believes the child is of age to come within the provisions of this act;

The affiant’s belief that the child sought is being neglected, unlawfully detained or physically abused and his health or welfare requires that he be taken immediately into custody, and a statement of the facts upon which the belief is based; and

The affiant’s belief that evidence of child abuse or neglect exists and could be obtained through forensic means, and a statement of the facts upon which the belief is based.

The warrant may be directed to any law enforcement officer of the county or municipality in which the place or premises to be searched is located. The warrant shall:

Name or describe the child sought;

Name the address or location and describe the place or premises to be searched;

State the grounds for issuance of the warrant;

Name the person or persons whose affidavit has been taken in support of the warrant; and

Authorize the officer to whom the warrant is directed to conduct the search and instruct him as to the disposition of the child if found, pending further proceedings by the court.

The officer making the search may enter the place or premises described in the warrant at any time with force if necessary, in order to remove the child or to obtain evidence that the child is neglected, unlawfully detained or physically abused. The officer conducting the search shall serve a copy of the warrant upon the person in possession of the place or premises searched and shall return the original warrant to the court showing his actions in the premises.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), added “or it appears by application supported by affidavit of one (1) or more adults that evidence of child abuse exists” at the end; and in the introductory language in (b), twice substituted “shall” for “must,” and added (b)(iii).

The 2006 amendment,

in (b), added “and” at the end of (ii) and made a related change in (i).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3 provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

§ 14-3-419.
Physical and mental examinations.

Any time after the filing of a petition, on motion of the district attorney or the child’s parents, guardian, custodian or attorney or on motion of the court, the court may order the child to be examined by a licensed and qualified physician, surgeon, psychiatrist, psychologist or licensed mental health professional designated by the court to aid in determining the physical and mental condition of the child. The examination shall be conducted on an outpatient basis, but the court may commit the child to a suitable medical facility or institution for examination if deemed necessary. Commitment for examination shall not exceed fifteen (15) days.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

§ 14-3-420.
Emergency medical, surgical or dental examination or treatment.

The court may authorize and consent to emergency medical, surgical or dental examination or treatment of a child taken into custody under the provisions of this act either before or after the filing of a petition, if in the opinion of a licensed and qualified physician or surgeon the child is suffering from a serious physical condition or illness which requires prompt treatment or prompt examination is necessary to preserve evidence of neglect.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

§ 14-3-421.
Reports of medical or mental examinations; use of results; copies.

The results of any medical or mental examination authorized or ordered by the court shall be reported to the court in writing and signed by the person making the examination. The results may not be considered by the court prior to adjudication but may be considered only in making a disposition under this act. Copies of the examination reports shall be made available to the child’s parents, guardian, custodian or attorney upon request.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

§ 14-3-422.
Advising of right to counsel required; appointment of counsel; verification of financial condition.

At their first appearance before the court and at their initial hearing the child’s parents, guardian or custodian shall be advised by the court of their right to be represented by counsel at every stage of the proceedings including appeal, and to employ counsel of their own choice.

The court shall upon request appoint counsel to represent the child’s parents, guardian or custodian if the child’s parents, guardian or custodian are unable to obtain counsel. If appointment of counsel is requested, the court shall require the child’s parents, guardian or custodian to verify their financial condition under oath, either by written affidavit signed and sworn to by the parties or by sworn testimony made a part of the record of the proceedings. The affidavit or sworn testimony shall state they are without sufficient money, property, assets or credit to employ counsel in their own behalf. The court may require further verification of financial condition if it deems necessary.

The court may appoint counsel for any party when necessary in the interest of justice.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2011, ch. 79, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), inserted “and at their initial hearing.”

Failure to advise of right to counsel.—

Even though the juvenile court transgressed a clear and unequivocal rule of law when it failed to advise the father of his right to counsel at his first appearance in the permanency hearing and thereafter failed to act on the father’s initial request for appointment of counsel, the father failed to establish that these errors materially prejudiced him, and therefore the court found no plain error. FH v. State (In the Interest of ECH), 2018 WY 83, 423 P.3d 295,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2018).

Failure to appoint counsel at juvenile proceeding. —

Mother did not show how the failure to appoint her counsel at an initial juvenile proceeding violated her due process rights regarding termination of parental rights proceedings; termination proceedings are entirely separate and distinct from neglect proceedings, deriving their respective genesis from separate statutes and requiring different burdens of proof. MN v. State, Dep't of Family Servs. (In the Interest of
MN), 2003 WY 135, 78 P.3d 232,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Attorney for Child Versus Guardian Ad Litem: Wyoming Creates a Hybrid, but is it a Formula for Malpractice?,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 381 (1999).

§ 14-3-423.
Rights of parties generally; demand for and conduct of jury trial.

A party to any proceeding under this act is entitled to:

A copy of all charges made against him;

Confront and cross-examine adverse witnesses;

Introduce evidence, present witnesses and otherwise be heard in his own behalf; and

Issue of process by the court to compel the appearance of witnesses or the production of evidence.

A party against whom a petition has been filed or the district attorney may demand a trial by jury at an adjudicatory hearing. The jury shall be composed of jurors selected, qualified and compensated as provided by law for the trial of civil matters in the district court. The jury may also be selected from the prospective jurors on the base jury list residing within five (5) miles of the city or town where the trial is to be held if the court directs. Demand for a jury trial must be made to the court not later than ten (10) days after the party making the demand is advised of his right to a jury trial at the initial hearing. No deposit for jury fees is required. Failure of a party to demand a jury is a waiver of this right.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2011, ch. 79, § 1; 2014 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), added “at the initial hearing” at the end of the fourth sentence.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the third sentence of (b), substituted “may also be selected from the prospective jurors on the base jury list” for “may be drawn from the jury panel of the district court or a special jury panel may be drawn from “jury box number three (3),” and substituted “if the court” for “whichever the court.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

Waiver of right to jury trial.—

Although a
parent argued that the parent did not waive the parent's right to
a jury trial, because the parent called the juvenile court and notified
it that the parent wanted a jury trial, the parent waived the right
to a jury trial when the parent failed to file a written jury demand
within ten days of the parent's initial hearing. CP v. State (In the Interest of NP), 2017 WY 18, 389 P.3d 787,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 14-3-424.
Conduct of hearings generally; exclusion of general public and child; exceptions; consolidations, continuances or deferrals permitted.

Unless a jury trial is demanded, hearings under this act shall be conducted by the court without a jury in an informal but orderly manner and separate from other proceedings not included under this act. The district attorney shall present evidence in support of the petition and otherwise represent the state. If the allegations in the petition are denied, adjudicatory and disposition hearings shall be recorded by the court reporter or by electronic, mechanical or other appropriate means.

Except in hearings to declare a person in contempt of court, the general public are excluded from hearings under this act. Only the parties, counsel for the parties, jurors, witnesses, and other persons the court finds having a proper interest in the proceedings or in the work of the court shall be admitted. If the court finds it necessary in the best interest of the child, the child may be temporarily excluded from any hearing.

Hearings on two (2) or more petitions may be consolidated for purposes of adjudication when the allegations in the petitions pertain to the same act constituting the alleged neglect. Separate hearings on the petitions may be held thereafter for purposes of disposition.

The court may, on the motion of any party or on its own motion, continue or defer any hearing as the work of the court or justice requires.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

Quoted in

LeBlanc v. State (In re ARLeB), 2017 WY 107, 401 P.3d 932,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

HP v. State, 2004 WY 82, 93 P.3d 982,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(2004).

§ 14-3-425.
Burden of proof required; verdict of jury; effect thereof.

Allegations of conduct showing a child to be neglected must be proved by a preponderance of the evidence.

If trial by jury is demanded, the jury shall decide issues of fact raised by the petition and return its verdict as to the truth of the allegations contained in the petition. A finding by the jury that the allegations are true is a determination that judicial intervention is necessary for the best interest and welfare of the child.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

Sufficient basis to terminate parental rights. —

In mother's appeal of the juvenile court's orders directing the Department of Family Services to pursue termination of the mother's parental rights that were entered after a review hearing in a neglect proceeding pursuant to the Child Protection Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann §§

14-3-401

through

14-3-440

, there was sufficient evidence for the juvenile court to find by a preponderance of the evidence, as required under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-425

, that the children were neglected. Reasonable efforts had been made to reunify the family, the mother persistently failed to comply with her case plan, and the children's health and safety would be jeopardized if they were returned to her. The court found that at the time the neglect petition was filed, the mother was in prison and unable to care for the children, the location of the father was unknown, the children were left with grandparents who could not care for them, and the mother had consented to the neglect disposition. The court also found that upon the mother's release from prison, she allowed the children to ride in a car with the father who was intoxicated and under the influence of drugs, and additionally exposed them to instability due to her lack of employment and housing. HP v. State, 2004 WY 82, 93 P.3d 982,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2004).

Cited

in

Jet v. State (In re Drt), 2010 WY 137, 241 P.3d 489,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Oct. 21, 2010); RH v. State (in the Interest of DRS), 2011 WY 128, 261 P.3d 697,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Sept. 14, 2011).

DH v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re “H” Children), 2003 WY 155, 79 P.3d 997,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 14-3-426.
Initial hearing; adjudicatory hearing; entry of decree and disposition; evidentiary matters; continuance of disposition hearing.

There shall be an initial hearing. The initial hearing may be held in conjunction with the shelter care hearing provided the requirements of W.S.

14-3-413

,

14-3-414

and

14-3-426

have been met. The initial hearing may also be held after a shelter care hearing or a transfer hearing. At the initial hearing, the child and his parents, guardian or custodian shall be advised by the court of their rights under law and as provided in this act. They shall also be advised of the specific allegations in the petition and given an opportunity to admit or deny them. They shall also be advised of the possible liability for costs of treatment or services pursuant to this act. It is not necessary at the initial hearing for the district attorney to establish probable cause to believe the allegations in the petition are true. If the allegations are admitted, the court shall make the appropriate adjudication and may proceed immediately to a disposition of the case, provided the court has the predisposition report and multidisciplinary team recommendations, in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

14-3-429

, except that a commissioner acting in the absence or incapacity of the judge may take testimony to establish a factual basis and accept an admission and perform all other requirements of the initial hearing but shall not proceed to disposition.

If the allegations of the petition are denied, the court may, with consent of the parties, proceed immediately to hear evidence on the petition or it may set a later time not to exceed sixty (60) days for an adjudicatory hearing, unless the court finds good cause to delay or postpone the hearing. In no case shall the court hold the adjudicatory hearing more than ninety (90) days after the date the petition is filed. Only competent, relevant and material evidence shall be admissible at an adjudicatory hearing to determine the truth of the allegations in the petition. If after an adjudicatory hearing the court finds that the allegations in the petition are not established as required by this act, it shall dismiss the petition and order the child released from any shelter care.

If after an adjudicatory hearing or a valid admission or confession the court or jury finds that a child is neglected, it shall enter a decree to that effect stating the jurisdictional facts upon which the decree is based. It may then proceed immediately or at a postponed hearing within sixty (60) days to make proper disposition of the child.

In shelter care hearings or disposition hearings, all material and relevant evidence helpful in determining questions may be received by the court and relied upon for probative value. The parties or their counsel may examine and controvert written reports received as evidence and cross-examine persons making the reports.

On motion of any party or on its own motion, the court may continue a disposition hearing for a reasonable time not to exceed sixty (60) days to receive reports and other evidence bearing on the disposition to be made. The court shall make an appropriate order for shelter care of the child or for his release from shelter care subject to any terms and conditions the court deems necessary during the period of continuance.

At any time prior to disposition under W.S.

14-3-429

, the court, on motion of any party or on its own motion, may reconsider its order regarding shelter care or conditions of release made under W.S.

14-3-409

or

14-3-414

.

In the absence or incapacity of the judge, the initial hearing may be conducted by a district court commissioner.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 199, § 1; 2004, ch. 127, § 2; 2011, ch. 79, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (b), inserted the proviso at the end of the first sentence and inserted the second sentence.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, rewrote (a), substituting the first three sentences for “At their initial hearing, which may be held after a shelter care hearing or a transfer hearing,” inserting “At the initial hearing” at the beginning of the fourth sentence, substituting “hearing” for “appearance” in the seventh sentence, deleting the former eighth sentence, which read: “When a shelter care hearing is held in accordance with W.S.

14-3-409

, a separate initial hearing is not required if the child and his parents, guardian or custodian were present at the shelter care hearing and advised by the court as provided in this subsection,” and adding the last sentence; and added (g).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-3-402(a)(xxiv).

Due process.—

Juvenile court violated a father’s right to due process because it failed to give him reasonable notice and a meaningful opportunity to be heard in the child protection action; many of the requirements of the Child Protection Act were not followed because the father was not informed when the child was taken into protective custody or of the shelter care hearing; the father was materially prejudiced by the due process violations because his lack of involvement colored the juvenile court’s ruling. AA v. State, 2021 WY 18, 479 P.3d 1252,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2021).

Mother's claim of no notice meritless. —

Mother's procedural due process rights were not violated even though the mother was not given notice that a visitation issue was going to arise at an initial hearing; this section gives notice to any parent that issues involving the conditions of shelter care can arise at any time, and the mother was given meaningful notice and opportunity to be heard when she challenged the trial court's ruling on visitation after the hearing. DH v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re "H" Children), 2003 WY 155, 79 P.3d 997,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. Jan. 13, 2004).

Improper preservation of issue for review. —

Court declined to address the merits of whether the State, trial court, or family services department failed to comply with this section, other sections, and various department rules in connection with the alleged lack of formal written reports and written case plan or the delay in setting an adjudicatory hearing because the mother failed to support her grievances with citations to relevant precedent and failed to show how any alleged deficiencies in the trial court prejudiced her; but the court did not retreat from its conviction that the judicial system had to be diligent in protecting parental rights, nor did the court imply that the department or any administrative agency was free to ignore statutes, agency rules, or court orders.DH v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re "H" Children), 2003 WY 155, 79 P.3d 997,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. Jan. 13, 2004).

Finding of neglect and order of placement transfer appealableorders. —

Court treated findings of fact and conclusions of law, which found neglect and ordered transfer of physical placement, as appealable orders because they had the effect of an adjudicatory decree and a dispositional order under this and other sections and they affected the mother's substantial rights.DH v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re "H" Children), 2003 WY 155, 79 P.3d 997,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. Jan. 13, 2004).

Jurisdiction following dismissal for failure to meet adjudicatory deadline. —

In the absence of unequivocal language to the contrary, a juvenile court did not lose jurisdiction to consider a neglect action when it dismissed without prejudice an initial neglect petition because the adjudicatory hearing was not held within 90 days of the filing of the petition as required by this section and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-409

and it allowed the petition to be refiled; the juvenile court's remedy of the situation gave due attention to the 90-day deadline, while still protecting the child, and mother was afforded due process protections and she was not unfairly prejudiced by the delay.
JA v. State, 2008 WY 15,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Feb. 8, 2008).

Mother's motion to withdraw admission of neglect properly denied.—

Trial court did not err in denying a mother's motion to withdraw her admission of child neglect because the court complied with Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 14-3-409(b) and 14-3-426(a) by carefully advising the mother of her rights in the placement proceedings, and of the consequences that could result from an admission or a finding of neglect; that was as far as the court was required to go.
Jet v. State (In re DRT), 2010 WY 137, 241 P.3d 489,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2010).

Cited

in

HP v. State, 2004 WY 82, 93 P.3d 982,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(2004); RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014); Scott v. Bd. of Trs., 2015 WY 128,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Sept. 18, 2015).